New York, session 2025-2026, S7242.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 510.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any provision of 4 law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the court shall impose a secur- 5 ing order committing any principal that is not a citizen of the United 6 States or a noncitizen lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the 7 United States to the custody of the sheriff, if such principal is 8 charged with a crime defined in title H or part one of the penal law 9 involving a peace officer, police officer, firefighter, emergency 10 medical services professional or other uniformed worker. Such securing 11 order shall not be revoked or otherwise terminated until the completion 12 of judicial proceedings related to such crime. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06813-01-5